Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Procedure in Replevin of Beasts, Goods, and Chattels

§ 5371.
Writs; court to which returnable.

Writ of replevin in actions under the provisions of sections 5321 and 5331 of this title shall issue out of the court to which returnable.
If the value of the property to be replevied is $5,000.00 or less, the writ may be returnable to any court; if the value of the property exceeds $5,000.00, the writ shall be returnable to a Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 142

, § 5, eff. Feb. 1, 1960;

1965, No. 194

, § 7, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 165, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 5372.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5373.
Bond.

The writ in an action of replevin commenced under the provisions of section 5321 or 5331 of this title shall not be issued until the plaintiff or someone in his or her behalf executes and delivers to the officer a bond to the defendant, with sufficient surety to be approved by the court, in a penalty double the value of the property to be replevied, with condition to prosecute the action to final judgment and pay such damages and costs as the defendant recovers against him or her, and also to return the property if that is the final judgment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 166, eff. March 29, 1972.

Partial bonds.

When replevin bond is conditioned for return of only part of the property, suit should be dismissed as to that for which no bond was given, and plaintiff cannot remedy his mistake by filing a new bond. Eastman v. Barnes, 58 Vt. 329, 1 A. 569, 1885 Vt. LEXIS 4 (1885).

§§ 5374,
5375.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.